Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.080

[Art. 10a] Confinement in jails.

Persons confined other than in a guard house, whether before, during, or after trial by a military court, shall be confined in civil jails, penitentiaries, or prisons designated by the governor or the adjutant general.

[ 2009 c 378 s 7; 1989 c 48 s 11; 1963 c 220 s 11.]